Maryland, session 2026, HB0696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0696*

HOUSE BILL 696
2–509.1.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the State shall
continue to include a prescription drug benefit plan in the health insurance benefit options
established under the Program and available to retirees under §§ 2–508 and 2–509 of this
subtitle notwithstanding the enactment of the federal Medicare Prescription Drug,
Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 or any other federal law permitting states to
discontinue prescription drug benefit plans to retirees of a state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:
(i) a retiree may elect to cover the retiree’s spouse or dependent
child under the State prescription drug benefit plan under §§ 2–508 and 2–509 of this
subtitle; and
(ii) if a surviving spouse or surviving dependent child of a retiree is
eligible to enroll in the State prescription drug benefit plan under § 2–508 or § 2–509 of this
subtitle, the surviving spouse or surviving dependent child may elect to enroll in the State
prescription drug benefit plan.
(b) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A RETIREE WHO BEGAN
STATE SERVICE ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2011.
(2) Except as provided in [subsection (c) of this section] PARAGRAPH (3)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, on January 1, 2019, the State shall discontinue prescription drug
benefits for:
[(1)] (I) a Medicare–eligible retiree;
[(2)] (II) the Medicare–eligible spouse or surviving spouse of a retiree; and
[(3)] (III) a Medicare–eligible dependent child or surviving dependent child
of a retiree.
[(c) (1)] (3) (I) If a retiree is eligible to participate in the prescription
drug benefit plan under Medicare, but the retiree’s spouse or dependent child is not eligible
to participate in a Medicare prescription drug benefit plan, the retiree may elect to cover
the retiree’s spouse or dependent child under the State prescription drug benefit plan.
[(2)] (II) If the surviving spouse or surviving dependent child of a retiree
is eligible to enroll in the State prescription drug benefit plan under § 2–508 or § 2–509 of
this subtitle, but is not eligible to participate in the prescription drug benefit plan under
Medicare, the surviving spouse or surviving dependent child may elect to enroll in the State
prescription drug benefit plan.

HOUSE BILL 696 3
[(d) (1) This subsection applies only to a retiree, a retiree’s spouse or surviving
spouse, and a retiree’s dependent child or surviving dependent child:
(i) who is enrolled in a prescription drug benefit plan under
Medicare;
(ii) if the retiree is retired on or before December 31, 2019; and
(iii) if the retiree is eligible under § 2–508 or § 2–509 of this subtitle
to enroll and participate in the health insurance benefit options established under the
Program.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, on or before
January 1, 2020, the Department shall establish a Maryland State Retiree Prescription
Drug Coverage Program that reimburses a participant for out–of–pocket costs that exceed
the limits established for non–Medicare–eligible retirees in § 2–508(d)(2)(iii) of this
subtitle.
(ii) The Department may establish an out–of–pocket limit higher
than the limits established in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for a retiree who qualifies
for a partial State subsidy.
(3) The Maryland State Retiree Prescription Drug Coverage Program
established under paragraph (2) of this subsection may include:
(i) a health reimbursement account established in accordance with
§ 105(h) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(ii) another program that provides assistance with prescription drug
costs.
(4) A retiree, a retiree’s spouse or surviving spouse, and a retiree’s
dependent child or surviving dependent child may enroll in the Maryland State Retiree
Prescription Drug Coverage Program during the open enrollment period or any special
enrollment period for retiree health insurance benefit options.
(e) (1) This subsection applies only to a retiree, a retiree’s spouse or surviving
spouse, and a retiree’s dependent child or surviving dependent child:
(i) who is enrolled in a prescription drug benefit plan under
Medicare; and
(ii) if the retiree:
1. began State service on or before June 30, 2011;
2. retired on or after January 1, 2020; and

HOUSE BILL 696
3. is eligible under § 2–508 or § 2–509 of this subtitle to enroll
and participate in the health insurance benefit options established under the Program.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, on or before
January 1, 2020, the Department shall establish a Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic
Prescription Drug Assistance Program that reimburses a participant for out–of–pocket
costs after the participant has entered catastrophic coverage under a prescription drug
benefit plan under Medicare.
(ii) The Department may establish a maximum reimbursement
amount for a retiree who qualifies for a partial State subsidy.
(3) The Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic Prescription Drug Assistance
Program under paragraph (2) of this subsection may provide reimbursements through:
(i) a health reimbursement account established in accordance with
§ 105(h) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(ii) another program that provides assistance with prescription drug
costs.
(4) A retiree, a retiree’s spouse or surviving spouse, and a retiree’s
dependent child or surviving dependent child may enroll in the Maryland State Retiree
Catastrophic Prescription Drug Assistance Program during the open enrollment period or
any special enrollment period for retiree health insurance benefit options.
(f) (1) This subsection applies only to a retiree, a retiree’s spouse or surviving
spouse, and a retiree’s dependent child or surviving dependent child:
(i) who is enrolled in:
1. the Maryland State Retiree Prescription Drug Coverage
Program established under subsection (d) of this section; or
2. the Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic Prescription
Drug Assistance Program established under subsection (e) of this section; and
(ii) if the retiree is eligible under § 2–508 or § 2–509 of this subtitle
to enroll and participate in the health insurance benefit options established under the
Program.
(2) (i) On or before January 1, 2020, the Department shall establish a
Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug Assistance Program that
reimburses a participant for out–of–pocket costs for a life–sustaining prescription drug that
is:

HOUSE BILL 696 5
1. covered by the prescription drug benefit plan in the health
insurance benefit options established under the Program; and
2. not covered by the prescription drug benefit plan under
Medicare in which the participant is enrolled.
(ii) The Department shall develop a list of the prescription drugs
that qualify for reimbursement under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) The Department may establish maximum reimbursement
amounts for a retiree who qualifies for a partial State subsidy.
(3) The Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug
Assistance Program established under paragraph (2) of this subsection may provide
reimbursements through:
(i) a health reimbursement account established in accordance with
§ 105(h) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(ii) another program that provides assistance with prescription drug
costs.
(4) A retiree, a retiree’s spouse or surviving spouse, and a retiree’s
dependent child or surviving dependent child shall be automatically enrolled in the
Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug Assistance Program on
enrollment in:
(i) the Maryland State Retiree Prescription Drug Coverage Program
established under subsection (d) of this section; or
(ii) the Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic Prescription Drug
Assistance Program established under subsection (e) of this section.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, not later than July 1 of each
year, the Secretary shall provide written certified notice of the change in the State
prescription drug benefit plan under this section to the individuals who will become eligible
in the next calendar year to enroll in the:
(i) Maryland State Retiree Prescription Drug Coverage Program;
(ii) Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic Prescription Drug
Assistance Program; or
(iii) Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug
Assistance Program.
(2) The notice shall include information regarding:

HOUSE BILL 696
(i) coverage options available in the Medicare prescription drug
benefit plan, including options that are similar to the prescription drug benefit plan in the
health insurance benefit options established under the Program;
(ii) the potential for significant penalties if an individual does not
promptly choose a Medicare prescription drug benefit plan immediately on termination of
the individual’s participation in the State prescription drug benefit plan;
(iii) the programs available under subsections (d), (e), and (f) of this
section; and
(iv) any additional resources made available by the Department in
accordance with this section.
(h) (1) The Department shall ensure Medicare–eligible retirees have access to
one–on–one counseling services to assist retirees in selecting a Medicare prescription drug
benefit plan.
(2) The Department shall develop a plan to communicate to
Medicare–eligible retirees the availability of:
(i) the programs under subsections (d), (e), and (f) of this section;
and
(ii) services and information regarding prescription drug benefit
plans under Medicare.
(3) On or before December 31, 2019, the Department shall submit a report
to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and the House Appropriations Committee,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the plan developed under
paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(4) The report required under paragraph (3) of this subsection shall
include:
(i) options for providing one–on–one counseling, including:
1. in–person, over–the–phone, or web–based counseling;
2. the times at which one–on–one counseling will be
available;
3. a plan to ensure equitable geographic access to
one–on–one counseling; and
4. entering into a statewide contract with an employee

HOUSE BILL 696 7
benefits administrator or similar entity to provide one–on–one counseling services;
(ii) plans for holding seminars in every county of the State to provide
information regarding eligibility for and available benefits under the programs established
under subsections (d), (e), and (f) of this section;
(iii) plans for providing access to a web–based overview and
interactive website that provide information on:
1. Medicare prescription drug benefit plans; and
2. subsidy and financial assistance programs for low–income
individuals; and
(iv) plans for providing a toll–free hotline for reporting issues and
concerns regarding the services provided in accordance with this paragraph.
(i) Subject to the requirements of § 13–108 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the Department may make an emergency procurement for:
(1) staff required to carry out the provisions of this section; and
(2) a third party to administer health reimbursement accounts established
under this section.
(j) The Department shall submit quarterly reports to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the House Appropriations
Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, and the Joint Committee on
Pensions, on:
(1) the status of establishing the programs under subsections (d), (e), and
(f) of this section, including:
(i) the status of procuring any contracts necessary to operate the
programs; and
(ii) the prescription drugs determined to qualify for reimbursement
under the Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug Assistance Program
under subsection (f) of this section;
(2) the availability of one–on–one counseling services required under
subsection (h) of this section;
(3) the details of the health reimbursement accounts or other programs to
provide assistance with prescription drug costs for individuals enrolled in the programs
under subsections (d), (e), and (f) of this section, including:

HOUSE BILL 696
(i) the specific out–of–pocket costs eligible for reimbursement;
(ii) the required process for receiving reimbursement;
(iii) the method of reimbursement;
(iv) the timing of reimbursement; and
(v) a plan to use debit cards to process reimbursements in a
convenient and efficient manner; and
(4) in total and by category for the previous quarter, the number of issues
and concerns reported to the hotline.
(k) The Department shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this
section.]
Chapter 767 of the Acts of 2019
[SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, if the final resolution of the injunction issued in the U.S. District Court
for the District of Maryland in Fitch v. State of Maryland et al, Case No. 1:18
CV–0287–PM (D. Md.) occurs on a date that is:
(1) less than 9 months before the first day of the next State health benefits
open enrollment period, the following shall begin on the first day of the second State health
benefits plan year immediately following the resolution:
(i) the elimination of the State prescription drug benefits for
Medicare–eligible retirees, Medicare–eligible spouses or surviving spouses of retirees, and
Medicare–eligible dependent children or surviving dependent children of retirees under §
2–509.1(b) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(ii) the establishment of the Maryland State Retiree Prescription
Drug Coverage Program, the Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic Prescription Drug
Assistance Program, and the Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug
Assistance Program in § 2–509.1(d), (e), and (f) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article,
respectively, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(iii) the provision of written certified notice to individuals under §
2–509.1(g) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
or
(2) 9 months or more before the first day of the next State health benefits
open enrollment period, the following shall begin on the first day of the State health
benefits plan year immediately following the resolution following the next open enrollment
period:

HOUSE BILL 696 9
(i) the elimination of the State prescription drug benefits for
Medicare–eligible retirees, Medicare–eligible spouses or surviving spouses of retirees, and
Medicare–eligible dependent children or surviving dependent children of retirees under §
2–509.1(b) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article;
(ii) the establishment of the Maryland State Retiree Prescription
Drug Coverage Program, the Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic Prescription Drug
Assistance Program, and the Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining Prescription Drug
Assistance Program in § 2–509.1(d), (e), and (f) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article,
respectively, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act; and
(iii) the provision of written certified notice to individuals under §
2–509.1(g) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.]
[SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the Department of Budget and Management establish the Maryland State
Retiree Prescription Drug Coverage Program, the Maryland State Retiree Catastrophic
Prescription Drug Assistance Program, and the Maryland State Retiree Life–Sustaining
Prescription Drug Assistance Program in § 2–509.1(d), (e), and (f) of the State Personnel
and Pensions Article, respectively, in a manner that allows retirees to access
reimbursement at the time of prescription drug purchase, through a mechanism such as
debit cards.]
[SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that the Department of Budget and Management attend at least one meeting
each year of the Joint Committee on Pensions to update the Committee on implementation
of the provisions of this Act.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.